Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.040

Detention order—Hearing—Expedited review.

If, after a hearing on offenses prescribed in Article I, section 20 of the state Constitution, the judicial officer finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that a person shows a propensity for violence that creates a substantial likelihood of danger to the community or any persons, and finds that no condition or combination of conditions will reasonably assure the safety of any other person and the community, such judicial officer must order the detention of the person before trial. The detainee is entitled to expedited review of the detention order by the court of appeals under the writ provided in RCW 7.36.160.

[ 2010 c 254 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.